Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-202
Judges; eligibility.

(1) No person shall be eligible to the office of judge of the Supreme Court unless he or she (a) is at least thirty years of age and a citizen of the United States, (b) has had five years of practice of law in the State of Nebraska which may include prior service as a judge, (c) is currently admitted to practice before the Nebraska Supreme Court, and (d) is, on the effective date of appointment, a resident and elector of the district he or she is to represent.

(2) This section and sections 24-301, 24-505.01, 43-2,118, 48-153, and 48-153.01 shall not apply to a person serving as a judge of the Supreme Court on August 24, 1979, who continues to serve as a judge of the Supreme Court after such effective date.

Laws 1879, § 12, p. 84;

R.S.1913, § 1138;

C.S.1922, § 1067;

C.S.1929, § 27-202;

R.S.1943, § 24-202;

Laws 1963, c. 128, § 1, p. 481;

Laws 1979, LB 237, § 1.